data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX P   r               -lo-íeis        or              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   r               -lo-iam         or              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   r               mo-lo           [iu]r           +G=m,AN=s
SFX P   r               mo-la           [iu]r           +G=f,AN=s
SFX P   r               mo-los          [iu]r           +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   r               mo-las          [iu]r           +G=f,AN=p
SFX P   r               mo-nos          [iu]r           +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   r               mos-vos         [iu]r           +G=m,AN=p

SFX B Y 2
SFX B   r               damente         [ia]r           +FSEM=vmente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo
SFX B   er              idamente        er              +FSEM=vmente,CAT=adv,SUBCAT=modo

SFX o Y 4
SFX o   r               dela            [ai]r           +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=dela
SFX o   r               delas           [ai]r           +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dela
SFX o   er              idela           er              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=dela
SFX o   er              idelas          er              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dela

SFX y Y 4
SFX y   o               eiro            o               +G=m,N=s,FSEM=eiro
SFX y   o               eiros           o               +G=m,N=p,FSEM=eiro
SFX y   a               eira            a               +G=f,N=s,FSEM=eiro
SFX y   a               eiras           a               +G=f,N=p,FSEM=eiro

SFX w Y 20
SFX w   0               so              o               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   0               sa              o               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   0               sos             o               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   0               sas             o               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   a               oso             a               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   a               osa             a               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   a               osos            a               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   a               osas            a               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   ção             cioso           ção             +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   ção             ciosa           ção             +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   ção             ciosos          ção             +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   ção             ciosas          ção             +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   e               oso             e               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   e               osa             e               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   e               osos            e               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   e               osas            e               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   0               oso             [^aeiou]        +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   0               osa             [^aeiou]        +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX w   0               osos            [^aeiou]        +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX w   0               osas            [^aeiou]        +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso

SFX j Y 25
SFX j   0               izar            l               +CAT=v,T=inf,FSEM=izar
SFX j   e               izar            e               +CAT=v,T=inf,FSEM=izar
SFX j   o               izar            o               +CAT=v,T=inf,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               zar             ia              +CAT=v,T=inf,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               izar            [^i]a           +CAT=v,T=inf,FSEM=izar
SFX j   0               izado           l               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   e               izado           e               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   o               izado           o               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               zado            ia              +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               izado           [^i]a           +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   0               izada           l               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   e               izada           e               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   o               izada           o               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               zada            ia              +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               izada           [^i]a           +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=s,FSEM=izar
SFX j   0               izados          l               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   e               izados          e               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   o               izados          o               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               zados           ia              +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               izados          [^i]a           +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   0               izadas          l               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   e               izadas          e               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   o               izadas          o               +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               zadas           ia              +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=f,N=p,FSEM=izar
SFX j   a               izados          [^i]a           +CAT=v,T=ppa,G=m,N=p,FSEM=izar

SFX G Y 29
SFX G   o               ice             [^çgc]o         +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ço              cice            ço              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   go              guice           go              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   co              quice           co              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   a               ice             [^çgc]a         +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ça              cice            ça              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ga              guice           ga              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ca              quice           ca              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   e               ice             e               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   0               ice             r               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   0               ice             [^v][^q]l       +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   vel             bilice          [^áí]vel        +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ável            abilice         ável            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ível            ibilice         ível            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   z               cice            z               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=ice
SFX G   o               ices            [^çgc]o         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ço              cices           ço              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   go              guices          go              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   co              quices          co              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   a               ices            [^çgc]a         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ça              cices           ça              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ga              guices          ga              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ca              quices          ca              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   0               ices            [^v][^q]l       +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   e               ices            e               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   0               ices            r               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   vel             bilices         [^áí]vel        +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ável            abilices        ável            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
SFX G   ível            ibilices        ível            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=ice
