data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
abesoirar/XYPL
abnegar/XYPLBcD
abrilhantar/XYPL
acalorar/XYPLB
acatar/XYPLMDv
aceitar/XYPLcMDnvB
acertar/XYPLSB
acitrinar/XYPL
acondimentar/XYPL
acurvar/XYPLM
admoestar/XYPLcD
afanar/XYPL
afetar/XYPLScnBR
afogar/XYPLMD
afundar/XYPLM
agradecer/XYPLRMvB
agricultar/XYPLv
ajoujar/XYPLM
alarve/Gp
alcoolificar/XYPLc
alcoviteiro/fpG
alentar/XYPLB
algaliar/XYPLc
alongar/XYPLM
amalgamar/XYPL
americanizar/XYPLc
amorenar/XYPL
anatomizar/XYPLc
angustiar/XYPLDnB
anojar/XYPLMD
apadroar/XYPL
apaixonar/XYPLnSvB
aparentar/XYPL
apimentar/XYPL
aposentar/XYPLcMD
apressar/XYPLDB
aprofundar/XYPLcMB
aprontar/XYPLM
arbitrar/XYPLMD
arranhar/XYPLD
arrelvar/XYPL
arrufar/XYPL
aselha/pG
asno/pG
assediar/XYPLD
assombrar/XYPLcM
assumir/XYPLRB
atabalhoar/XYPLBcM
atediar/XYPL
atombar/XYPL
atropar/XYPL
avançar/XYPLMD
avioletar/XYPL
baboso/fpG
bacoco/fpG
balofo/fpG
banana/ptG
bandalho/fpG
barrar/XYPLM
basbaque/Gp
beata/Gp
besta/pG
bichano/fpG
bicho/fplG
bizantino/fpiG
bizarro/fpG
bobo/fpG
bodega/pG
bolchevizar/XYPLcn
borracho/pG
borrego/pG
brasileiro/fpiG
brejeiro/fpG
burro/fplhG
cachopo/fpG
cachorro/plG
calcificar/XYPLc
caloiro/fpG
canalha/ipG
candonga/pG
capacho/lpG
carambola/pG
caricaturar/XYPL
carola/iGp
casmurro/fpG
centuplicar/XYPL
chafurdo/fG
charme/pw
chocalho/Gp
chocar/XYPLnB
chocho/fpG
choco/fpG
chupar/XYPLMD
coadministrar/XYPL
comedir/PLSMB
comercializar/XYPLc
comprovar/XYPLcDnBv
concessionar/XYPLu
confiar/XYPLSBv
consensualizar/XYPLnc
contramurar/XYPL
corromper/XYPLMD
criança/pGh
cunhar/XYPLD
defensar/XYPLv
demorar/XYPLB
denudar/XYPL
desajeitar/XYPLB
desambiguar/XYPLc
descabelar/XYPL
descompadrar/XYPLB
desconjuntar/XYPLB
descravar/XYPL
desengonçar/XYPL
desesperar/XYPLcBDn
desfolhar/XYPLcMD
desleixar/XYPLB
desmesurar/XYPLv
despoletar/XYPL
despreocupar/XYPLcB
desventrar/XYPLc
devotar/XYPLcMB
disfarçar/XYPLB
ditoso/pmjf
doido/fpG
doutorar/XYPLM
educar/XYPLRScDvB
embalsamar/XYPLcMDn
embustear/ZYPL
empunhar/XYPL
encarregar/XYPL
encostar/XYPLSM
endiabrar/XYPLB
enfileirar/XYPLM
enlaçar/XYPLM
ensombrar/XYPL
enternecer/XYPLMDB
enublar/XYPLc
equilibrar/XYPLScDnRB
errar/XYPLnB
esborrachar/XYPL
escrever/XYPLRDn
esforçar/XYPLDB
espalmar/XYPLD
esquadrinhar/XYPLMD
esquisito/fpG
estouvado/fpG
estrangular/XYPLcMD
exagerar/XYPLcBD
extinguir/YXPLDv
extrudir/XYPLDB
fatigar/XYPLDnB
fechar/XYPLM
fidalgo/fplhG
florear/ZYPL
fofo/fplhG
fundamentar/XYPLcnB
gabarola/pG
gago/fpG
garantir/XYPLDB
garoto/fpG
gesticular/XYPLcD
hastear/ZYPL
ilegalizar/XYPLcD
imputar/XYPLcDv
imundo/fpmG
inchar/XYPLcMSB
individuar/XYPLcDn
inquietar/XYPLcMDn
inspirar/XYPLcDvB
interessar/XYPLSnB
interiorizar/XYPLcD
inverter/XYPLvB
islamizar/XYPLnc
justificar/XYPLcDIBn
lamentar/XYPLcDB
lapisar/XYPL
limitar/XYPLcnvDB
lisonjear/ZYPLD
louco/fpmG
macaco/fplhG
malandro/fpG
malignar/XYPLn
maluco/fplG
marcar/XYPLcDnBS
mastrear/ZYPL
matreiro/pG
meigo/pGf
mercantilizar/XYPL
mesquinho/fGpm
mimalho/fpG
mitigar/XYPLcDv
moderar/XYPLcDnvB
multar/XYPL
nojo/G
nomenclar/XYPLD
obstinar/XYPLBc
ondear/ZYPLMn
ousar/XYPLB
oxidular/XYPL
palerma/pG
parolo/fpG
particularizar/XYPLcn
pateta/ipG
pedante/piG
pedincha/pG
pelintra/piG
percolar/XYPLcDR
pincelar/XYPL
piolho/pG
posicionar/XYPLMR
premeditar/XYPLc
presumir/XYPLDB
procurar/XYPLcD
prolongar/XYPLcMvB
provocar/XYPLcDn
pulha/pG
radicalizar/XYPLnc
realistar/XYPL
recatar/XYPLB
receitar/XYPL
reconhecer/XYPLMDvB
redondear/ZYPL
regerar/XYPL
rememorar/XYPLcDv
repintar/XYPL
resignar/XYPLcnvB
respeitar/XYPLDnB
responsabilizar/XYPLSDvc
resumir/XYPLDB
retrilhar/XYPL
ritmar/XYPL
sagrar/XYPLcDB
salpicar/XYPLD
sebento/G
selecionar/XYPLDvE
sentir/YLMPB
sincronizar/XYPLBcS
sino/py
sintetizar/DXYPLcn
soletrar/XYPLcD
sonso/fpG
sossegar/XYPLDB
sovina/G
submeter/XYPLM
suprir/XYPLMDv
tacanho/Gfpm
telecomandar/XYPL
temperar/XYPLSMDnvB
tolerar/XYPLnvdB
tolo/fplhG
tonto/fpmG
transformar/XYPLcDnv
traquina/pG
trinar/XYPLc
vaiar/XYPLD
vexar/XYPLcDn
vincar/XYPLB
voltear/ZYPL
pressinto/PL
investem/PLRS
sirvo/PL
aguamos/PL
desambiguas/PL
coíbam/PL
descobri/RPL
desimpeçais/PL
instruirão/PL
pondes/PLR
porias/PLR
comporemos/PLR
corroem/PL
corroeríamos/PL
moerei/PL
remoa/PL
remoeriam/PL
roerá/PL
consigas/PL
sigo/PL
dera/PL
verás/PL
verdes/PL
reveja/PL
preveriam/PL
preveres/PL
entreviras/PL
teremos/PL
tivesses/PL
detêm/PL
deterdes/PL
mantiveras/PL
obteria/PL
obtivésseis/PL
retinhas/PL
trazes/PL
trouxessem/PL
haverá/PL
houvessem/PL
serias/PL
hámster/B
revêem/PL
articular/BDILPSXYcmnpv
camelo/Gflp
capital/ijmpt
circular/BDLXYcdmnp
coobrigar/LPXYc
especular/BDLXYcmp
modular/BDLPXYcdnp
palmar/LPXYp
sorna/Ghp
vir/LP
fosses/LP
